Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Health Coverage
18A.2255.
Health benefit plans and other information to be submitted to Advisory Committee of State Health Insurers — Approval or recommendations for changes — Committee to advise on options, bids, administration, and drug formulary — Written report or testimony.

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall submit to the Advisory Committee of State Health Insurance Subscribers established in KRS

18A.225

, at least thirty (30) days prior to issuing requests for proposals, the health benefit plans that will be submitted to carriers. The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall also provide to employee organizations who are represented on the Advisory Committee of State Health Insurance Subscribers information necessary so that the member representing the organization can fulfill his or her responsibilities under this section. The advisory committee shall submit in writing to the secretary the committee’s approval of the plans or its recommendations on changes to the plans no later than seven (7) days prior to the issuance of requests for proposals. The advisory committee shall advise the secretary on:

Health insurance benefit options that should be included in the program;

Procedures for soliciting bids or requesting proposals for contracts from carriers for the program;

The implementation, maintenance, and administration of the health insurance benefits under the program; and

The development of a uniform prescription drug formulary that contains fair and reasonable standards and procedures for patient access to medically necessary alternatives to the formulary and patient choice of higher-cost alternatives to the formulary, and that ensures that discounts negotiated with drug manufacturers are passed to the program.

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall, at the discretion of the co-chairs of the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, either submit a written report to or testify before the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on the state employee health insurance program for the next plan year prior to the issuance of the requests for proposals.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 5, effective October 19, 2004.

18A.2256.
TRICARE supplement insurance for public employees.

The provisions of this section shall take effect to the extent that they are not preempted by 10

U.S.C. sec. 1097

c, other federal law, or federal regulation.

As used in this section:

“TRICARE” means the Department of Defense health care program for active duty and retired uniformed service members and their families; and

“Employee” has the same meaning as in KRS

18A.225

.

Beginning with plan year 2009, the Personnel Cabinet, Department of Employee Insurance, shall select and contract with one (1) or more providers to offer a group TRICARE supplement product to eligible employees who are eligible TRICARE beneficiaries.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky shall pay the cost of individual TRICARE supplement insurance to cover the employee, not to exceed the cost of the lowest-priced individual plan offered to public employees. The employee shall pay the cost of coverage for his or her spouse and dependent children.

Those employees eligible for TRICARE insurance who elect the Commonwealth of Kentucky-sponsored TRICARE supplement insurance shall not be eligible for other coverage offered through the Public Employee Health Insurance Program. Those employees eligible for TRICARE insurance who choose not to elect the Commonwealth of Kentucky-sponsored TRICARE supplement insurance shall continue to be eligible for the coverage offered through the Public Employee Health Insurance Program.

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 123, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 10, § 4, effective July 12, 2012.

18A.2257.
Comprehensive dental and vision insurance and health discount plans for state employees on voluntary payroll deduction basis — Administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

18A.2258.
Pharmacy benefit claims monitoring — Contract provisions — Requirements — Administrative regulations.

By December 31, 2022, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, upon the recommendation of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet and in accordance with KRS Chapter 45A, select and enter into a contract, the effective date of which shall not be later than January 1, 2023, with a single independent entity for the purpose of monitoring all pharmacy benefit claims for every individual enrolled in the Public Employee Health Insurance Program.

A contract entered into pursuant to this subsection shall:

Not be for a term longer than two (2) years but may be renewed for like or lesser periods; and

Limit compensation paid to the contracted entity to not more than thirty percent (30%) of the total savings generated by the contracted entity as determined by the Personnel Cabinet.

To be eligible to receive a contract pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, an entity shall:

Be capable of performing the analysis of pharmacy benefit claims to validate accuracy and identify errors in near real time;

Not be an entity that performs annual retroactive audits of pharmacy benefit claims for the Public Employee Health Insurance Program; and

Not be affiliated by common parent company or holding company, share any common members of the board of directors, or share managers in common with:

An insurer contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.225

;

A third-party administrator contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.2254

; or

A pharmacy benefit manager contracted by:

The Personnel Cabinet;

An insurer contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.225

; or

A third-party administrator contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.2254

.

The entity contracted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall:

Be granted full access to:

Any contract awarded to a pharmacy benefit manager for the purpose of administering pharmacy benefits in the Public Employee Health Insurance Program and all pertinent reference documents within that contract, including but not limited to any price lists or specialty drug price lists which shall be provided to the monitoring entity contracted pursuant to this section by the Personnel Cabinet and which shall be updated by the Personnel Cabinet within five (5) days of the effective date of any pricing changes;

Any other contract that defines a pharmacy benefit manager’s obligations and responsibilities as it relates to processing Public Employee Health Insurance Program pharmacy benefit claims, including any contract between the pharmacy benefit manager and an insurer contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.225

or a third-party administrator contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.2254

; and

Invoices and unaltered claims files associated with the Public Employee Health Insurance Program pharmacy benefits;

Analyze one hundred percent (100%) of invoices or claims submitted for payment by the Public Employee Health Insurance Program. The entity shall not utilize statistical sampling methods in lieu of analyzing all invoices and claims;

Identify and correct errors in pharmacy benefit claims in order to avoid or reduce erroneous overpayments by an insurer contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.225

, a third-party administrator contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.2254

, or a pharmacy benefit manager contracted to administer pharmacy benefits in the Public Employee Health Insurance Program;

Identify underpayments made by an insurer contracted pursuant to KRS 18A.225, a third-party administrator contracted pursuant to KRS 18A.2254, or a pharmacy benefit manager contracted to administer pharmacy benefits in the Public Employee Health Insurance Program;

Identify inappropriate or erroneous fees imposed by an insurer contracted pursuant to KRS 18A.225, a third-party administrator contracted pursuant to KRS 18A.2254, or a pharmacy benefit manager contracted to administer pharmacy benefits in the Public Employee Health Insurance Program; and

Beginning on April 30, 2023, and quarterly thereafter, submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission. The report shall include a summary of the analysis and errors identified pursuant to paragraphs (c), (d), and (e) of this subsection during the previous quarter.

The entity contracted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall not perform drug utilization reviews.

The analysis of claims and the identification of potential errors required by subsection (3)(b), (c), and (d) of this section shall:

Occur prior to the due date of each claim or invoice submitted by an insurer contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.225

, a third-party administrator contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.2254

, or a pharmacy benefit manager contracted to administer pharmacy benefits in the Public Employee Health Insurance Program or within five (5) days of receipt of the claim or invoice, whichever is later; and

Consider at least the following:

Compliance with all relevant administrative regulations promulgated by the Personnel Cabinet;

Compliance with all state and federal laws relating to or applicable to the Public Employee Health Insurance Program;

Compliance with any contract between a pharmacy benefit manager and the Personnel Cabinet, an insurer contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.225

, or a third-party administrator contracted pursuant to KRS

18A.2254

; and

The market competitiveness of pharmacy benefit payments, including the adequacy of payments to pharmacies.

The Personnel Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out this section.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 223, § 19, effective July 14, 2022.

18A.2259.
Mail-order drug option for maintenance drugs.

Any self-insured plan offered by the Personnel Cabinet shall include a mail-order drug option for maintenance drugs for public employees, and maintenance drugs may be dispensed by mail in accordance with Kentucky law. The mail-order drug option shall not permit the dispensing of a controlled substance classified in Schedule II. The self-insured plan shall not discriminate against any retail pharmacy located within the geographic coverage area of the plan that meets the terms and conditions for participation established by the plan, including price, dispensing fee, and copay requirements of a mail-order drug option. The retail pharmacy shall not be required to dispense by mail. The net cost to the plan for a quantity of maintenance drugs dispensed by mail order shall not exceed the net cost to the plan for the same quantity of the same drug dispensed by a retail pharmacy under the terms and conditions established for dispensing and reimbursement at retail.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 164, § 5, effective July 12, 2006.

18A.226.
Group Health Insurance Board — Members — Duties.

To provide quality, affordable health insurance coverage so that the Commonwealth can attract and retain able and dedicated public employees, and to facilitate the need for comprehensive and efficient planning, implementation, and administration of a state employee health insurance program in order to meet this goal, the Kentucky Group Health Insurance Board is created. The board shall be attached to the Personnel Cabinet for administrative purposes only. The board shall consist of thirteen (13) members as follows:

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet;

The state budget director;

The commissioner of education;

The chair of the Advisory Committee of State Health Insurance Subscribers;

The commissioner of insurance, ex officio;

The Auditor of Public Accounts, ex officio;

The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, or his designee;

One (1) retired state employee appointed by the Kentucky Retirement Systems, who shall serve an initial term of one (1) year;

One (1) retired teacher appointed by the Teachers’ Retirement System, who shall serve an initial term of two (2) years;

One (1) active teacher appointed by the organization with the largest number of teacher members on payroll deduction, who shall serve an initial term of one (1) year;

One (1) active state employee appointed by the organization with the largest number of state employee members on payroll deduction, who shall serve an initial term of two (2) years; and

One (1) active classified education support employee appointed by the organization with the largest number of classified education support employee members on payroll deduction, who shall serve an initial term of one (1) year.

As each appointed member’s term expires, the vacancy created shall be filled by the appointing authority for that position for a term of two (2) years. An appointment to fill an unexpired term of an appointed member shall be made by the designated appointing authority for the remainder of the term. Appointed terms shall begin effective October 1.

The members of the board shall elect from among its members a chair and a vice chair.

Regular meetings of the board shall be held at least once every month at a place, day, and time determined by the board. Special meetings of the board shall be held when needed as determined by the chair. If seven (7) or more members of the board request in writing that the chair call a special meeting, the chair shall call a special meeting. The meetings shall operate in accordance with the provisions of the Open Meetings Law under KRS

61.805

to

61.850

.

Members of the board shall receive reimbursement for necessary expenses for attendance at official board meetings or public hearings.

The Kentucky Group Health Insurance Board shall:

Engage in analyses and research to identify the factors and parameters that affect the state group health insurance program;

Develop and transmit, by October 1 of each year beginning October 1, 2001, to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, policy recommendations regarding benefit options and management of the state group health insurance program; and

Provide in the first report, due by October 1, 2001, the following:

Analysis and discussion of methods used by all other states to provide health insurance benefits to their state group; and

Analysis and discussion of the cost, enrollment, claims, and utilization data for calendar year 2000 on the Kentucky state group; and

Recommendations including but not limited to appropriate structures for the state contribution rate which shall include recommendations on increasing the state contribution to provide support for dependent coverage, possible methods to mitigate adverse selection, competitive plan designs by type and benefit options, the feasibility of a state self-insurance plan, and strategies for evaluating third-party administrators and vendors.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 438, § 1, effective April 21, 2000; 2002, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 24, § 29, effective July 15, 2010.

18A.227.
Flexible benefits plan for employees and retirees.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Cafeteria plan” shall mean a flexible benefits plan which meets the requirements of Section 125 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code;

“Employee” shall mean a person, including an elected public official, who is regularly employed by any department, board, agency, or branch of state government, and who is a contributing member to any one (1) of the retirement systems administered by the state;

“Cabinet” shall mean the Personnel Cabinet;

“Change in family status” shall have the same meaning as used in Section 125 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations promulgated thereunder; and

“Salary reduction contribution” means all employer contributions that are excludable from gross income under the Internal Revenue Code.

As part of the employee benefits provided to state employees under this chapter, the cabinet may develop and make available to eligible employees a flexible benefits plan which meets the requirements for treatment as a cafeteria plan under Section 125 of the Internal Revenue Code. The plan shall be in writing and shall be available on an equal basis to all eligible employees within each county.

Options available under the plan may include, but are not limited to:

Health insurance coverage;

Managed health care coverage;

Catastrophic illness coverage;

Dental insurance;

Term life insurance-accidental, death, or dismemberment;

Vision insurance;

Long term disability insurance;

Long term medical care; and

Any other benefits which may be offered under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and which the cabinet determines to be in the best interests of state employees.

Any employee who desires to participate in options offered under the plan, may direct that any options elected shall be funded through payroll deduction. Once an option is chosen, it shall not be changed until the end of the period for which election is made unless the employee experiences a change in family status, other change of status, or special enrollment rights under the Federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 which necessitates a revision of his benefit election.

Any employee contributions required toward the purchase of the selected options shall be made by a salary reduction contribution, to the extent the benefits would be considered to be tax-free under Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code, and by after-tax salary deduction where the elected option is not tax-free.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 395, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 350, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 46, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 438, § 6, effective April 21, 2000; 2002, ch. 352, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

18A.2271.
Unused funds in flexible spending accounts may be carried forward to next plan year.

Employees who participate in a medical expense flexible spending account plan pursuant to KRS

18A.227

may carry forward to the succeeding plan year unused funds remaining in the flexible spending account at the end of the plan year to the extent that such carryforward is allowed by the Internal Revenue Code in effect on the date the plan year ends.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 5, effective October 19, 2004.

18A.228.
“State employee” defined.

For purposes of KRS

18A.228

to

18A.228

6, the term “state employee” shall mean a person, including an elected public official, who is regularly employed by any department, board, agency, or branch of state, municipal, urban-county, charter county, or county government, and who is a contributing member of any of the retirement systems administered by the state and including any federally-funded time-limited employee. It shall also include a person who must fulfill the requirements established by the State Board of Education for eligibility and a person who is a present or future recipient of a retirement allowance from any of the Kentucky Retirement Systems who either satisfies the requirements of KRS

61.559

or who is board-authorized under KRS 61.702(1), including a beneficiary of a retired employee as defined in KRS

61.542

who is receiving a retirement allowance from any of the Kentucky Retirement Systems and shall include a member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan as provided in KRS

18A.2287

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 5, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 92, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 350, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/13/90) 1990 Ky. Acts ch. 348, §§ 1 and 2 were enacted to be placed within the range of KRS

18A.228

to

18A.2284

. However, because of space limitations within this range, these two sections were codified as KRS

18A.2285

and

18A.228

6, respectively. Accordingly, the prior reference within this section to the former end section of the range has been changed by the Reviser of Statutes to read KRS

18A.2286

, pursuant to his authority under KRS

7.136

.

18A.2281.
State employee benefit fund for self-insurance. [Repealed.]

18A.2282.
Custody and supervision of state employee benefit fund — Duties — Moneys credited to fund — Special reserve — Investments — Reports. [Repealed.]

18A.2283.
Tax exemption for self-funded health insurance plan. [Repealed.]

18A.2284.
Date option available — Initial enrollment period. [Repealed.]

18A.2285.
Exclusions. [Repealed.]

18A.2286.
Continuation coverage for member retired for disability.

If the hospital and medical insurance coverage provided under KRS

161.675

contains any limitation for pre-existing conditions, a member of the Teachers’ Retirement System who retires for disability under KRS

161.661

shall be offered the right to continue coverage under the self-funded plan until any such limitation has expired. The terms and conditions for continuation of group policies under KRS

304.18-110

shall apply to the continuation coverage offered under this section. Nothing in KRS

304.18-110

shall be construed to prevent the operation of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 348, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

18A.2287.
Availability of state health insurance plan coverage for certain former legislators.

A member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan who leaves the General Assembly after completing twelve (12) or more years service in the General Assembly and who has not received any benefits under the Legislators’ Retirement Plan may elect to be covered under the state health insurance plan for state employees provided under this chapter if the member pays the premium.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 92, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

18A.2288.
Coverage of pre-existing conditions in changes of state health plan and upon retirement of CERS or KERS member. [Repealed.]

18A.229.
Alternative health coverage plans for state employees. [Repealed.]